src/orthography/allcaps.xfscript
# Xerox xfst script file to optionally uppercase all lexical entries.
# Extend the alphabet as needed by your language.

define WB [ "#" | .#. ] ;
define uppercase [
    A|B|C|D|E|F|G|H|I|J|K|L|M|N|O|P|Q|R|S|T|U|V|X|Y|Z|
    Á|À|Ã|Ä|Å|Æ|É|È|Ê|Ë|Í|Ì|Î|Ï|Ð|Ñ|Ó|Ò|Ô|Õ|Ö|Ø|Ú|Ù|Û|Ü|Ý|Þ|Š|Ž
    ];

define allcaps      a (->) A, b (->) B, c (->) C, d (->) D, e (->) E,
f (->) F, g (->) G, h (->) H, i (->) I, j (->) J, k (->) K, l (->) L,
m (->) M, n (->) N, o (->) O, p (->) P, q (->) Q, r (->) R, s (->) S,
t (->) T, u (->) U, v (->) V, w (->) W, x (->) X, y (->) Y, z (->) Z,
á (->) Á, à (->) À, â (->) Â, ã (->) Ã, ä (->) Ä, å (->) Å, æ (->) Æ, 
è (->) È, é (->) É, ê (->) Ê, ë (->) Ë, ì (->) Ì, í (->) Í, î (->) Î, 
ï (->) Ï, ð (->) Ð, ñ (->) Ñ, ò (->) Ò, ó (->) Ó, ô (->) Ô, õ (->) Õ, 
ö (->) Ö, ø (->) Ø, ù (->) Ù, ú (->) Ú, û (->) Û, ü (->) Ü, ý (->) Ý, 
þ (->) Þ, š (->) Š, ž (->) Ž
\/
WB uppercase* _ uppercase* WB ;

push allcaps
